Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,106
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2017. Court-ordered indemnification.

(1) A director who is a party to a proceeding because he or she is a director may apply for indemnification or an advance for expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After receipt of an application and after giving any notice it considers necessary, the court shall:

(a) Order indemnification if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under section 21-20,104;

(b) Order indemnification or an advance for expenses if the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or an advance for expenses pursuant to a provision authorized by subsection (1) of section 21-20,110; or

(c) Order indemnification or an advance for expenses if the court determines, in view of all the relevant circumstances, that it is fair and reasonable:

(i) To indemnify the director; or

(ii) To advance expenses to the director, even if he or she has not met the relevant standard of conduct set forth in subsection (1) of section 21-20,103, failed to comply with section 21-20,105, or was adjudged liable in a proceeding referred to in subdivision (4)(a) or (b) of section 21-20,103, but if he or she was adjudged so liable his or her indemnification shall be limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

(2) If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification under subdivision (1)(a) of this section or to indemnification or an advance for expenses under subdivision (1)(b) of this section, it shall also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses incurred in connection with obtaining court-ordered indemnification or an advance for expenses. If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or an advance for expenses under subdivision (1)(c) of this section, it may also order the corporation to pay the director's reasonable expenses to obtain court-ordered indemnification or an advance for expenses.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 106.

Occupation tax, see Chapter 21, article 3.